California statutes. Education Code
 accompanying material justifying the proposed adjustment. The Director of Finance is authorized to approve only those adjustments related to activities required by statute. The Director of Finance shall approve or disapprove the amount within 30 days of receipt of the request and shall notify the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature of the decision.

(b) (1) The assessment or series of assessments developed or acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have sufficient range to assess pupils in grades 2 to 12, inclusive, in English listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills. These assessments shall include the use of accessibility resources, as may be determined by the department, and those determinations shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Pupils in kindergarten and grade 1 shall be assessed in English listening and speaking, and, once an assessment is developed, early literacy skills. Six months after the results of three administrations are collected, but no later than June 30, 2013, the department shall report to the Legislature on the administration of the kindergarten and grade 1 early literacy assessment results, as well as on the administrative process, in order to determine whether reauthorization of the early literacy assessment is appropriate.

(2) In the development and administration of the assessment for pupils in kindergarten and grade 1, the department shall minimize any additional assessment time, to the extent possible. To the extent that it is
 technically possible, items that are used to assess listening and speaking shall be used to measure early literacy skills. The department shall ensure that the assessment and procedures for its administration are age and developmentally appropriate. Age- and developmentally appropriate procedures for administration may include, but are not limited to, one-on-one administration, a small group setting, and orally responding or circling a response to a question.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “kindergarten” does not include transitional kindergarten.

(4) The assessment for initial identification
 developed or acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have sufficient range to identify if the pupil is an English learner, as defined by Section 306.

(c) The assessment for initial identification shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Have psychometric properties of reliability and validity deemed adequate by technical experts.

(2) Be capable of administration to pupils with any primary language other than English.

(3) Be capable of administration by classroom teachers.

(4) Not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, or gender.

(5) Be aligned with the standards for English language development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60811.3, as it read on June 30, 2013.

(6) Be age and developmentally appropriate for pupils.

(d) The assessment for initial identification shall be used to identify pupils who are limited English proficient.

(e) The summative assessment shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Provide sufficient information about pupils at each grade level to determine levels of proficiency ranging from no English proficiency to fluent English proficiency with at least two intermediate levels.

(2) Yield scores that allow comparison of the growth of a pupil over time, that may be tied to readiness for various instructional options, and that may be aggregated for use in the evaluation of program effectiveness.

(3) Have psychometric properties of reliability and validity deemed adequate by technical experts.

(4) Be capable of administration to pupils with any primary language other than English.

(5) Be capable of administration by classroom teachers.

(6) Not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, or gender.

(7) Be aligned with the standards for English language development
 adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60811.3, as it read on June 30, 2013.

(8) Be age and developmentally appropriate for pupils.

(f) The summative assessment shall be used for both of the following purposes:

(1) To identify the level of English language proficiency of pupils who are limited English proficient.

(2) To assess the progress of limited-English-proficient pupils in acquiring the skills of listening, reading, speaking, and writing in English.

(g) (1) A pupil in any of grades 3 to 12, inclusive, shall not be required to retake those portions of the assessment that
 measure English language skills for which the pupil has previously tested as advanced within each appropriate grade span, as determined by the department in accordance with paragraph (8) of subdivision (e).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a pupil in any of grades 10 to 12, inclusive, shall not be required to retake those portions of the assessment that measure English language skills for which the pupil has previously tested as early advanced or advanced.

(3) This subdivision shall not be implemented unless and until the department receives written documentation from the United States Department of Education that implementation is permitted by federal law.

(h) (1) The Superintendent shall
 not administer an assessment for initial identification or a summative assessment pursuant to this section until both assessments are developed and adopted by the state board.

(2) The Superintendent shall report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature when the assessments are ready for their initial administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 15, Sec. 3.   (AB 2268)   Effective June 14, 2024.   Note: See administrative conditions in subd. (g).)
-------------------------------------------

60811.

The state board shall approve standards for English language development for pupils whose primary language is a language other than English. The standards shall be comparable in rigor and specificity to the standards for English language arts adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8, the standards for mathematics adopted pursuant to Sections 60605.8 and 60605.11, and the standards for science adopted pursuant to Section 60605.85.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (AB 899)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60811.8.

(a) Commencing in the 2019–20 school year, a middle school or high school pupil who is classified as an English learner, except as specified in subdivision (d), shall not be denied participation in the standard instructional program of a school by being denied any of the following:

(1) Enrollment in courses that are part of the standard instructional program of the school that the pupil attends. For purposes of this section, “standard instructional program” means, at a minimum, core curriculum courses, as defined in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 33126, courses required to meet state and local graduation requirements, and courses
 required for middle school grade promotion.

(2) Enrollment in a full course load of courses that are part of the standard instructional program.

(3) Enrollment in courses that are not part of a school’s standard instructional program that either meet the subject matter requirements for purposes of recognition for college admission pursuant to Section 66205.5 or are advanced courses, such as honors or advanced placement courses, on the sole basis of a pupil’s classification as an English learner.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school to create supplemental courses in languages other than English.

(c) For purposes of this section,
 “pupil” includes a pupil attending a school operated by a school district or a county office of education, a charter school, or the state special schools for the blind and the deaf.

(d) (1) Provided that, pursuant to federal law, the pupil’s course of study is designed to remedy any academic deficits incurred during participation and that the pupil’s course of study is reasonably calculated to enable that pupil to attain parity of participation in the standard instructional program within a reasonable length of time after the pupil enters the school system, the following pupils may be denied access to enrollment in a course described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a):

(A) (i) A middle school or high school pupil who is classified as an English learner and who is a newcomer pupil.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), “newcomer pupil” has the same meaning as “immigrant children and youth,” as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) A middle school or high school pupil who is classified as an English learner and who is participating in a program designed to meet the academic
 and transitional needs of newcomer pupils that has as a primary objective the development of English language proficiency.

(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit, restrict, or discourage the enrollment of a pupil described in paragraph (1) in courses described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 342, Sec. 5.   (AB 714)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60812.

Commencing the school year following the year in which the Superintendent of Public Instruction has developed or identified a test pursuant to this chapter, the State Department of Education shall place the results of the statewide test, including average scores for every school district on its Internet site for public access.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System [60900. - 60902.]

60900.

(a) The department shall contract for the development of proposals that will provide for the retention and analysis of longitudinal pupil achievement data on the tests administered pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 60600) and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810). The longitudinal data shall be known as the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(b) The proposals developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall evaluate and determine whether it would be most effective, from a fiscal and a technological perspective, for the state to own the system. The proposals shall additionally evaluate and determine the most effective means of housing the system.

(c) The California
 Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System shall be developed and implemented in accordance with all state rules and regulations governing information technology projects.

(d) The system or systems developed pursuant to this section shall be used to accomplish all of the following goals:

(1) To provide school districts and the department access to data necessary to comply with federal reporting requirements delineated in the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(2) To provide a better means of evaluating educational progress and investments over time.

(3) To provide local educational agencies with the data needed to improve pupil achievement, including college and career readiness.

(4) To provide an efficient, flexible, and secure means of maintaining longitudinal statewide pupil level data between and among the state’s educational segments and operational tools, as defined in Section 10861, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Pupil level data from all grade levels, including transitional kindergarten programs, as described in Section 48000, that shall be collected separately from kindergarten pupil data, in elementary and secondary schools, including, but not limited to, juvenile court schools, alternative schools, continuation schools, special education schools, and adult educational programs offering a high school diploma or equivalency.

(B) Pupil level data collected in detention and nondetention settings.

(C) Pupil level data to postsecondary educational institutions and the Student Aid Commission.

(5) To facilitate the ability of the state to publicly report data, as specified in Section 6401(e)(2)(D) of the federal America COMPETES Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 9871) and as required by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5).

(6) To ensure that any data access provided to researchers, as required pursuant to the federal Race to the Top regulations and guidelines is provided, only to the extent that the data access is in compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(e) In order to comply with federal law as delineated in the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), the local educational
 agency shall retain individual pupil records for each test taker, including all of the following:

(1) All demographic data collected from the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP) and English language development tests.

(2) Pupil achievement data from assessments administered pursuant to the CAASPP and English language development testing programs. To the extent feasible, data should include subscore data within each content area.

(3) A unique pupil identification number, to be identical to the pupil identifier developed pursuant to the California School Information Services, that shall be retained by each local educational agency and used to ensure the accuracy of information on the header sheets of the CAASPP tests and the English language development test.

(4) All data necessary to compile reports required by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), including, but not limited to, dropout and graduation rates.

(5) Other data elements deemed necessary by the Superintendent, with the approval of the state board, to comply with the federal reporting requirements delineated in the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), and the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), after review and comment by the advisory board convened pursuant to subdivision (j). Before the implementation of this paragraph with respect to adding data elements to the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the purpose of complying with the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), the department and the appropriate
 postsecondary educational agencies shall submit an expenditure plan to the Department of Finance detailing any administrative costs to the department and costs to any local educational agency, if applicable. The Department of Finance shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a copy of the expenditure plan within 10 days of receipt of the expenditure plan from the department.

(6) To enable the department, the University of California, the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to meet the requirements prescribed by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), these entities shall be authorized to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing July 1, 2010, on students who have attended their respective systems, to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students, to conduct the annual analysis of district-level and individual
 district or postsecondary education system performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.

(f) To accomplish the goals and requirements set forth in subdivisions (d) and (e), local educational agencies shall do all of the following:

 (1) Submit data to the department according to the processes and timelines established by the department.

(2) After any schoolsite closure, inform the department of the schoolsite closure within 10 business days of the last day that pupils were no longer enrolled at the schoolsite.

(3) Submit grades 9 to 12, inclusive, pupil transcript information to
 the California College Guidance Initiative, as authorized pursuant to Section 60900.5, according to processes and timelines established by the California College Guidance Initiative in the format approved by the Superintendent. In complying with this paragraph, the duties of local educational agencies shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Including in their parent notifications, as required by the federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), a distinct notification that data may be shared with the California College Guidance Initiative in order to do both of the following:

(i) Provide pupils and their families with direct access to online tools and resources for college and career planning.

(ii) Enable a pupil to transmit information shared with the
 California College Guidance Initiative to both of the following:

(I) Institutions of higher education for purposes of admissions and academic placement.

(II) The Student Aid Commission for purposes of determining eligibility for, and increasing uptake of, student financial aid.

(B) Entering into a data sharing agreement with the California College Guidance Initiative on or before January 1, 2026. These agreements shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 49073.1.

(C) Providing, on or before June 30, 2026, the California College Guidance Initiative with initial data files, pursuant to the California High School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard, as acknowledged by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data, and the accompanying data
 file specifications.

(D) Completing the steps necessary to provide transcript-informed accounts to all pupils in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(E) Providing data files or authorizing the California College Guidance Initiative to access data pursuant to this paragraph as follows:

(i) In a manner as agreed to between the California College Guidance Initiative and the local educational agency.

(ii) To confirm completed courses, final grades, and graduation dates of pupils, in a format and as determined by the California College Guidance Initiative, for purposes of admissions to the California State University and the University of California.

(iii) Through either an application
 programming interface or a secure file transfer protocol.

(g) On or before June 30, 2026, using reports on CaliforniaColleges.edu and technical assistance from the California College Guidance Initiative, local educational agencies shall ensure that data needed to verify course eligibility to fulfill the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University is accurate and up to date. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Confirming that each course is properly coded and registered in the University of California A–G course management portal at the office of the President of the University of California.

(2) Ensuring that pupils transferring from local educational agencies get full credit for prior A–G coursework by complying with the California High
 School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard, as acknowledged by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data.

(3) Maintaining at least a 90 percent rate of alignment between A–G coursework, as listed in the local pupil information system, and how those courses are registered in the University of California A–G course management portal at the office of the President at the University of California.

(4) Ensuring that dual enrollment courses are flagged based on the California High School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard, developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60900.5.

(h) The California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System shall have all of the following characteristics:

(1) The ability to sort by
 demographic element collected from the CAASPP tests and English language development test.

(2) The capability to be expanded to include pupil achievement data from multiple years.

(3) The capability to monitor pupil achievement on the CAASPP tests and English language development test from year to year and school to school.

(4) The capacity to provide data to the state and local educational agencies upon their request.

(5) The capability to provide data to support individual pupil accounts, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 60900.5.

(i) Data elements and codes included in the system shall comply with Sections 49061 to 49079, inclusive, and Sections 49602 and
 56347, with Sections 430 to 438, inclusive, of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), and with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), Section 1232h of Title 20 of the United States Code, and related federal regulations.

(j) The department shall convene an advisory board consisting of representatives or designees from the state board, the Department of Finance, the State Privacy Ombudsman, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, representatives of parent groups, school districts, and local educational agencies, and education researchers to establish privacy and access protocols, provide general guidance, and make recommendations relative to data elements. The department is encouraged to seek representation broadly reflective of the general public of
 California.

(k) This section shall be implemented using federal funds received pursuant to the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), which are appropriated for purposes of this section in Item 6110-113-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2002 (Chapter 379 of the Statutes of 2002). The release of these funds is contingent on approval of an expenditure plan by the Department of Finance.

(l) For purposes of this chapter, a local educational agency shall include a county office of education, a school district, and a charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 87.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60900.1.

(a) (1) The department shall publicly report on an annual basis on its internet website enrollment data by English language acquisition status and disability.

(2) As used in paragraph (1), disability shall include reporting on each of the following categories:

(A) Intellectual disability.

(B) Hard of hearing.

(C) Deafness.

(D) Speech or language impairment.

(E) Visual impairment.

(F) Emotional disturbance.

(G) Orthopedic impairment.

(H) Other health impairment.

(I) Deaf-blindness.

(J) Multiple disability.

(K) Autism.

(L) Traumatic brain injury.

(M) Specific learning disability.

(b) The department shall, on an annual basis, include a report on its internet website that allows the public to view the following assessment data by English language acquisition status:

(1) California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress test results by English language arts, mathematics, and science.

(2) English Language Proficiency Assessments for California.

(c) For purposes of this section, “English language acquisition status” includes, but is not limited to, separately reporting data
 for all of the following:

(1) Long-term English learners, as defined in Section 313.1.

(2) English learners at risk of becoming long-term English
 learners, as defined in Section 313.1.

(3) English learners.

(4) Reclassified fluent English proficient pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 907, Sec. 1.   (AB 1868)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60900.2.

(a) On or before January 1, 2025, the department shall include a report on its internet website that allows the public to view statewide-level four- and five-year cohort graduation rates for pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, disaggregated by the identified disability or disabilities, as listed in Section 300.8(a)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, a pupil who is an individual with exceptional needs shall have the same meaning as “child with a disability” as that phrase is defined in Section 300.8(a)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) The implementation of this section shall be contingent upon an appropriation for these purposes in
 the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60900.5.

(a) The California College Guidance Initiative (CCGI), as defined in Section 10861, is hereby authorized to provide its services to all local educational agencies.

(b) In furtherance of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 10867, the department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the CCGI, as authorized in subdivision (a), to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Share pupil course level data to inform individual pupil accounts on the operational tools.

(2) Collect additional data elements to ensure proper functioning and to incentivize use of the operational tools.

(3) Share pupil level data with the Student Aid Commission, postsecondary educational institutions, and programs that support college and career planning, application, and transition, as permitted under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 10860 and subdivision (c) of Section 10863, fully effectuate the intent of the California Cradle-to-Career Data System Act pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10850) of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(c) The department, the California State University, the University of California, the California Community Colleges, and the Student Aid Commission shall promote the California High School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard, which is maintained in a repository of data
 standards at the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data and managed by the CCGI for use by all local educational agencies that serve pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, to support uniformity of electronic student transcript data.

(d) The department shall provide guidance to local educational agencies through CalPADS to clarify data standards and promote best practices.

(e) The department shall refer local educational agencies to CCGI for technical assistance for both of the following:

(1) Reconciling
 discrepancies between A–G coursework, as listed in their local pupil information system, and how those courses are registered in the University of California Course Management Portal at the office of the President of the University of California, or a successor A–G course management portal.

(2) Ensuring that dual enrollment courses are flagged in the data files submitted to CCGI, as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900, based on the California High School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard and its associated data specifications pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (g) of Section 60900.

(f) The department shall inform local educational agencies of the additional use of data submitted to CCGI pursuant to paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900, and advise local educational agencies to include in their annual parent notifications, as required by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), that the data will:

(1) Be shared with the CCGI.

(2) Be used to provide pupils and families with direct access to online tools and resources.

(3) Enable a pupil to transmit information shared with the CCGI to both of the following:

(A) Postsecondary educational institutions for purposes of admissions and academic placement.

(B) The Student Aid Commission for purposes of determining eligibility for, and increasing uptake of, student financial aid.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares its intent that the CCGI, upon full implementation and ongoing administration of this section, provide all of the following services:

(1) A free college and career planning curriculum and internet website for grades 6 to 12, inclusive, designed to provide touch points three to six times per year.

(2) Financial aid curriculum for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, and developed in consultation with the Student Aid Commission.

(3) Support to local educational agencies to plan for and monitor use of planning tools and curriculum.

(4) Tools to enable pupils and their families to determine if they are on track to meet college qualifications, based on their individual
 goals, and to allow authorized secondary school counselors to view the progress of individual pupils on meeting California State University and University of California eligibility requirements.

(5) Validation of data relating to A–G admission requirements for all coursework, including, but not limited to, dual enrollment coursework, in local pupil information systems that is flagged with respect to the University of California Course Management Portal.

(6) Technical assistance to local educational agencies on data cleanup processes.

(7) Providing statewide pupil identification numbers to the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, and the Student Aid
 Commission so that information stored in local systems will improve matches for research purposes and the California Cradle-to-Career Data System.

(8) Transcripts processed in near real time with the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, and the Student Aid Commission, using an application programming interface.

(9) Inform the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California of high school pupils’ demographic and program participation information, including, but not limited to, whether they are a first-generation college student, homeless, migrant, or economically disadvantaged.

(10) Provide information and data on race or ethnicity, grade point average, high school graduation status, pupil and parent contact
 information, and where pupils applied to college to the Student Aid Commission through a faster application programming interface format and pursuant to a memorandum of understanding. This process shall only go into effect after data-sharing agreements have been established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900 between all California local educational agencies and the California College Guidance Initiative, and the California College Guidance Initiative has received complete data files from all local educational agencies pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900.

(11) Prepopulation of California Community Colleges, California State University, and University of California application fields related to statewide pupil identification numbers, transcript data, demographic information, and other data elements that can reduce barriers for pupils.

(12) Development of new planning tools related to career and technical education pathways, apprenticeships, transfer options, and regional labor markets.

(h) The scaling of the CCGI is further intended to address all of the following problems and state needs:

(1) Reduce equity gaps in college-going rates by ensuring that all pupils and their families have the information needed to develop college and career plans, starting in grade 6, and to secure financial aid.

(2) Enable secondary school counselors to monitor where pupils are applying and support them to complete applications.

(3) Identify secondary school courses that are incorrectly flagged as fulfilling California State University and
 University of California eligibility requirements compared to the University of California Course Management Portal.

(4) Reduce structural barriers by allowing pupils to launch college and financial aid applications from a single location, using one set of log on credentials.

(5) Ensure that pupils can easily and quickly transmit academic records to public postsecondary educational institutions when applying for admission.

(6) Share additional information with the Student Aid Commission to validate and reduce the time to determine eligibility for Cal Grant awards.

(7) Reduce the administrative burden on local educational agencies and colleges to transmit and validate records.

(8) Strengthen data that can be used to match pupil records.

(i) On or before September 1, 2022, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter, the Riverside County Office of Education, in collaboration with the department, shall report to the Director of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee regarding the annual budget for the CCGI as supported through the annual Budget Act. The annual report due on or before September 1, 2022, shall only address any changes to the first annual report provided in March 2022 pursuant to this subdivision. Each annual report thereafter shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) All other public and private sources of revenue.

(2) How prior fiscal year funds were spent and current fiscal year funds are
 budgeted to be spent.

(3) A budget change proposal, if any additional funds are being requested for the budget year.

(4) The names and locations of local educational agencies that have partnered with the CCGI, including identification of local educational agencies that were added in the prior fiscal year and are intended to be added in the budget year.

(5) The names of postsecondary educational agencies that have partnered with the CCGI, including identification of postsecondary educational agencies that were added in the prior fiscal year and the budget year and identification of any postsecondary educational agencies that terminated their partnership with the CCGI.

(6) Internet website analytics on identifying the number of accounts, types of
 activities completed, and the number of pupils that applied to college via the CCGI.

(7) Information on progress towards meeting the deliverables expected of the CCGI pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 128.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

60901.

(a) Contingent upon the receipt of federal funds for this purpose, the department, in consultation with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall prepare the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System established pursuant to Section 60900 to include data on a quarterly rate of pupil attendance. Preparation shall include all of the following:

(1) The addition of fields to facilitate the transfer of data.

(2) System development activities including any business rules and definitions that would be needed to improve the quality and consistency of the data.

(3) Processes for the transfer of data from
 local educational agencies.

(4) Consultation with organizations representing school, district, and county education administrators, classified and certified staff, and parents in order to develop the criteria and frequency of reports on pupil attendance data and other indicators as may be submitted by local educational agencies.

(b) The system shall support local educational agencies in their efforts to identify and support pupils at risk of dropping out and shall be capable of issuing to local educational agencies periodic reports that include, but may not be limited to, district, school, class, and individual pupil reports on both of the following:

(1) Rates of absence.

(2) Chronic absentees.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “chronic absentee” means a pupil who is absent on 10 percent or more of the schooldays in the school year when the total number of days a pupil is absent is divided by the total number of days the pupil is enrolled and school was actually taught in the regular day schools of the district, exclusive of Saturdays and Sundays.

(2) Once available, chronic absentee rates shall be incorporated into the annual report on dropouts required pursuant to Section 48070.6.

(3) In addition to the calculation of absentee rates performed pursuant to paragraph (1), once the department has completed and reported the collection of data pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 46211, the department shall also report an alternate chronic absenteeism rate calculation, which includes pupil attendance accrued through
 an attendance recovery program pursuant to Sections 46210 and 46211.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to support the development of early warning systems to enable the identification and support of individual pupils who are at risk of academic failure or dropping out of school. The systems shall encompass the following characteristics:

(1) The utilization of highly predictive indicators, including attendance, course grades or completion, performance on assessments of pupil achievement, suspensions, and expulsions.

(2) A thorough validation process to ensure the predictive reliability of the systems.

(3) Periodic reports that inform principals, teachers, and parents in a manner that enables timely identification and support of individual pupils
 who are at risk of academic failure or dropping out.

(e) When the system established pursuant to Section 60900 is prepared to accept data on a quarterly rate of pupil attendance, a local educational agency may submit data to the department on a quarterly rate of pupil attendance and other indicators as identified by the department. It is the intent of the Legislature that schools identified on the list of persistently lowest-achieving schools will fully utilize the early warning systems described in subdivision (d).

(f) A local educational agency that reports attendance data for pupils to the system established pursuant to Section 60900 may request, and the department shall provide, the early warning report described in subdivision (d) up to four times each school year.

(g) The department shall notify local
 educational agencies that reporting pupil attendance and chronic absentee data pursuant to this section is voluntary. The notice shall include a description of the benefits of reporting pupil attendance and chronic absentee data in fostering the development of effective supports and interventions for at-promise pupils.

(h) This section shall not be implemented unless federal funds are appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 89.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

60902.

(a) (1) Beginning with the 2025–26 school year, the department shall define, consistent with paragraph (2), and collect, as part of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data
 System,
 annual pupil enrollment data for each pupil enrolled in an expanded learning opportunity program. For purposes of this section, an expanded learning opportunity program may include, but is not limited to, all of the following programs:

(A) An expanded learning opportunity program operated by a local educational agency pursuant to Section 46120.
